Utah, session 2026, HB281.
Section 1. Section 34A-2-302 is amended to read:34A-2-302. Employee's willful misconduct -- Penalty.(1)For purposes of this section:(a)"Controlled substance" is as defined in Section 58-37-2.(b)"Local government employee" is as defined in Section 34-41-101.(c)"Local governmental entity" is as defined in Section 34-41-101.(d)"State institution of higher education" is as defined in Section 34-41-101.(e)"THC" means the same as that term is defined in Section 4-41-102.(f)(i)"THC analog" means a substance that is structurally or pharmacologically substantially similar to, or is represented as being similar to, delta-9-THC.(ii)"THC analog" does not include the following substances or the naturally occurring acid forms of the following substances:(A)cannabichromene (CBC), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 20675-51-8;(B)cannabicyclol (CBL), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 21366-63-2;(C)cannabidiol (CBD), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 13956-29-1;(D)cannabidivarol (CBDV), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 24274-48-4;(E)cannabielsoin (CBE), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 52025-76-0;(F)cannabigerol (CBG), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 25654-31-3;(G)cannabigerovarin (CBGV), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 55824-11-8;(H)cannabinol (CBN), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 521-35-7;(I)cannabivarin (CBV), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 33745-21-0;(J)delta-9-tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV), the cannabinoid identified as CAS# 31262-37-0; or(K)a non-intoxicating metabolite of tetrahydrocannabinol, including 11-nor-9-carboxy-delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.(e)(g)"Valid prescription" is a prescription, as defined in Section 58-37-2, that:(i)is prescribed for a controlled substance for use by the employee for whom it was prescribed; and(ii)has not been altered or forged.(2)An employee may not:(a)remove, displace, damage, destroy, or carry away any safety device or safeguard provided for use in any employment or place of employment;(b)interfere in any way with the use of a safety device or safeguard described in Subsection (2)(a) by any other person;(c)interfere with the use of any method or process adopted for the protection of any employee in the employer's employment or place of employment; or(d)fail or neglect to follow and obey orders and to do every other thing reasonably necessary to protect the life, health, and safety of employees.(3)(a)Except in case of injury resulting in death:(a)(i)compensation provided for by this chapter shall be reduced 15% when injury is caused by the willful failure of the employee:(i)(A)to use safety devices when provided by the employer; or(ii)(B)to obey any order or reasonable rule adopted by the employer for the safety of the employee; and.(b)exceptExcept when the employer permitted, encouraged, or had actual knowledge of the conduct described in Subsection (4):(i)disability compensation may not be awarded under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, to an employee when the major contributing cause of the employee's injury is the employee's conduct described in Subsection (4); or(ii)disability compensation to an employee under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, shall be reduced by 15% when the employee's conduct is a contributing cause of the employee's injury but not the major contributing cause.(4)The conduct described in Subsection (3)(b) is the employee's:(a)knowing use of a controlled substance that the employee did not obtain under a valid prescription;(b)intentional abuse of a controlled substance that the employee obtained under a valid prescription if the employee uses the controlled substance intentionally:(i)in excess of prescribed therapeutic amounts; or(ii)in an otherwise abusive manner; or(c)intoxication from alcohol with a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .05 grams or greater as shown by a chemical test.; or(d)notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection (4), intoxication from THC or a THC analog with a whole blood level of THC or THC analog in excess of 20 nanograms/ml.(5)(a)For purposes of Subsections (3) and (4), as shown by a chemical test that conforms to scientifically accepted analytical methods and procedures and includes verification or confirmation of any positive test result by gas chromatography, gas chromatography-mass spectroscopy, or other comparably reliable analytical method, before the result of the test may be used as a basis for the presumption, it is presumed that the major contributing cause of the employee's injury is the employee's conduct described in Subsection (4) if at the time of the injury:(i)the employee has in the employee's system:(A)any amount of a controlled substance or its metabolites if the employee did not obtain the controlled substance under a valid prescription; or(B)a controlled substance the employee obtained under a valid prescription or the metabolites of the controlled substance if the amount in the employee's system is consistent with the employee using the controlled substance intentionally:(I)in excess of prescribed therapeutic amounts; or(II)in an otherwise abusive manner; or(ii)the employee has a blood or breath alcohol concentration of .05 grams or greater.; or(iii)notwithstanding any other provision of this Subsection (5)(a), the employee has a concentration of THC or THC analog in whole blood that exceeds 20 nanograms/ml.(b)The presumption created under Subsection (5)(a) may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence showing that:(i)the chemical test creating the presumption is inaccurate because the employer failed to comply with:(A)Sections 34-38-4 through 34-38-6; or(B)if the employer is a local governmental entity or state institution of higher education, Section 34-41-104, Subsection 34-41-103(7), or, if applicable, Subsection 34-41-103(6);(ii)the employee did not engage in the conduct described in Subsection (4);(iii)the test results do not exclude the possibility of passive inhalation of marijuana because the concentration of total urinary cannabinoidsTHC or THC analog in whole blood is less than 5020 nanograms/ml as determined by a blood test conducted in accordance with:(A)Subsection (8); and(B)(I)Sections 34-38-4 through 34-38-6; or(B)(II)if the employer is a local governmental entity or state institution of higher education, Section 34-41-104, Subsection 34-41-103(7), or, if applicable, Subsection 34-41-103(6);(iv)a competent medical opinion from a physician verifies that the amount of controlled substances, metabolites, or alcohol in the employee's system does not support a finding that the conduct described in Subsection (4) was the major contributing cause of the employee's injury or a contributing cause of the employee's injury; or(v)(A)the conduct described in Subsection (4) was not a contributing cause of the employee's injury; or(B)(vi)the employee's mental and physical condition were not impaired at the time of the injury.(c)(i)Except as provided in Subsections (5)(c)(ii) and (iii), if a chemical test that creates the presumption under Subsection (5)(a) is taken at the request of the employer, the employer shall comply with:(A)Title 34, Chapter 38, Drug and Alcohol Testing; or(B)if the employee is a local governmental employee or an employee of a state institution of higher education, Title 34, Chapter 41, Local Governmental Entity Drug-Free Workplace Policies.(ii)Notwithstanding Section 34-38-13, the results of a test taken under Title 34, Chapter 38, Drug and Alcohol Testing, may be disclosed to the extent necessary to establish or rebut the presumption created under Subsection (5)(a).(iii)Notwithstanding Section 34-41-103, the results of a test taken under Title 34, Chapter 41, Local Governmental Entity Drug-Free Workplace Policies, may be disclosed to the extent necessary to establish or rebut the presumption created under Subsection (5)(a).(6)(a)A test sample taken pursuant to this section shall be taken as a split sample.(b)One part of the sample is to be used by the employer for testing pursuant to Subsection (5)(a):(i)at a testing facility selected by the employer; and(ii)at the employer's or the employer's workers' compensation carrier's expense.(c)The testing facility selected under Subsection (6)(b) shall hold the part of the sample not used under Subsection (6)(b) until the sooner of:(i)six months from the date of the original test; or(ii)when the employee requests that the sample be tested.(d)The employee has only six months from the date of the original test to have the remaining sample tested:(i)at the employee's expense; and(ii)at the testing facility selected by the employee, except that the test shall meet the requirements of Subsection (5)(a).(7)If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision of this section to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this section shall be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(8)When testing for a cannabinoid under this section a blood test shall be used.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.